South Dakota, session 2026, SB80.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 34-20B-117 be AMENDED:
34-20B-117. The following actions are unlawful:
(1) To knowingly sell or distribute a product intended for human consumption
containing delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol, THC-O
acetate, or hexahydrocannabinol to a person under the age of twenty-one;
(2) The purchase or attempt to purchase, the receipt or attempt to receive, the
possession, or the consumption of, a product intended for human consumption
containing delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol, THC-O
acetate, or hexahydrocannabinol to a person under the age of twenty-one; and
(3) To purchase a product intended for human consumption containing delta-8
tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol, THC-O acetate, or
hexahydrocannabinol on behalf of, or to give a product intended for human
consumption containing delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol, THC-O acetate, or hexahydrocannabinol to, any person
under the age of twenty-one, unless the purchaser is a parent or guardian of the
person under the age of twenty-one.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.